Utah statutes.
10-5-130.   Town fiscal committee -- Creation -- Appointment of members --
Terms -- Vacancies -- Functions.
(1) There is hereby created a town fiscal committee, the members of which
shall be:
(a)  four elected or appointed municipal officials, appointed by the state
auditor from a list recommended by the Utah League of Cities and Towns; and
(b)  two additional members who are knowledgeable in the area of municipal
fiscal affairs appointed by the state auditor.
(2)  Members shall be appointed to four-year terms, provided that the term of
an elected official shall terminate on ceasing to be an elected official, but
any appointed position shall be deemed to be vacated if the member fails to
attend more than two consecutive regularly scheduled meetings of the
committee.
(3)  Any vacancy shall be filled by the state auditor from the same class as
the original appointment as described in Subsection (1). Members may be
reappointed.
The committee shall assist, advise and make recommendations to the state
auditor in the preparation of uniform accounting and reporting procedures and
program and performance accounting, budgeting, and reporting for towns.
